Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-919
Mentally ill and dangerous person; dangerous sex offender; emergency protective custody; evaluation by mental health professional.

(1)(a) A law enforcement officer may take a person into emergency protective custody, cause him or her to be taken into emergency protective custody, or continue his or her custody if he or she is already in custody if the officer has probable cause to believe:

(i) Such person is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender and that the harm described in section 71-908 or subdivision (1) of section 83-174.01 is likely to occur before mental health board proceedings under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act may be initiated to obtain custody of the person; or

(ii) For a person domiciled within Indian country in Nebraska, that such person is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender under tribal law and that harm comparable to that described in section 71-908 or subdivision (1) of section 83-174.01 or the equivalent under tribal law is likely to occur before mental health proceedings under tribal law may be initiated to obtain custody of the person.

(b) Such person shall be admitted to an appropriate and available medical facility, jail, or Department of Correctional Services facility as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(c)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(c)(ii) of this section, each county shall make arrangements with appropriate facilities inside or outside the county for such purpose and shall pay the cost of the emergency protective custody of persons from such county in such facilities.

(ii) For a subject domiciled within Indian country in Nebraska for whom emergency protective custody is initiated under tribal law, the tribe shall make arrangements with appropriate facilities inside or outside the tribe for such purpose and shall make arrangements for payment of the cost of the emergency protective custody of persons from such tribe in such facilities.

(d) A mental health professional who has probable cause to believe that a person is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender may cause such person to be taken into custody and shall have a limited privilege to hold such person until a law enforcement officer or other authorized person arrives to take custody of such person.

(2)(a) For purposes of this subsection, convicted sex offender means a person with a prior conviction for an offense listed in section 29-4003.

(b) A person taken into emergency protective custody under this section who is not a convicted sex offender shall be admitted to an appropriate and available medical facility, except that such person may instead be admitted to a jail or other facility with an available mental health bed under the Regional Mental Health Expansion Pilot Program Act until an appropriate medical facility is available.

(c) A person taken into emergency protective custody under this section who is a convicted sex offender shall be admitted to a jail or Department of Correctional Services facility unless a medical or psychiatric emergency exists for which treatment at a medical facility is required. The person in emergency protective custody shall remain at the medical facility until the medical or psychiatric emergency has passed and it is safe to transport such person, at which time the person shall be transferred to an available jail or Department of Correctional Services facility.

(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (3)(b) of this section, upon admission to a facility or jail of a person taken into emergency protective custody by a law enforcement officer under this section, such officer shall execute a written certificate prescribed and provided by the Department of Health and Human Services. The certificate shall allege the officer's belief that the person in custody is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender and shall contain a summary of the person's behavior supporting such allegations. A copy of such certificate shall be immediately forwarded to the county attorney.

(b) In the case of a subject domiciled within Indian country who is taken into emergency protective custody by a law enforcement officer under tribal law, upon admission to a facility or jail, such officer shall execute written documentation in a format provided by the tribe. At a minimum, such documentation shall clearly identify the subject, identify the relevant tribe, allege the officer's belief that the person in custody is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender under tribal law, and contain a summary of the subject's behavior supporting such allegations. A copy of such documentation shall be immediately forwarded to the appropriate tribal prosecutor or tribal official.

(4)(a) The administrator of the facility or jail shall have such person evaluated by a mental health professional as soon as reasonably possible but not later than thirty-six hours after admission. The mental health professional shall not be the mental health professional who causes such person to be taken into custody under this section and shall not be a member or alternate member of the mental health board that will preside over any hearing under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act with respect to such person. Upon the agreement of all parties, the evaluation may be conducted by videoconferencing if the mental health professional thinks it appropriate under the circumstances.

(b) A person shall be released from emergency protective custody after completion of such evaluation unless the mental health professional determines, in his or her clinical opinion, that such person is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender. In the case of a subject domiciled within Indian country who is taken into emergency protective custody under tribal law, the mental health professional shall notify an appropriate tribal prosecutor or official of such release.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 30;

Laws 1978, LB 501, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 257, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 964;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 95;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1020;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 39;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 38;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 462;

Laws 2024, LB1288, § 14;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 109;

Laws 2026, LB816, § 5.
April 8, 2026
Regional Mental Health Expansion Pilot Program Act, see section 47-1201.

Sex Offender Commitment Act, see section 71-1201.